Hawaii statutes.
[§329D-3] Qualifications for licensure.
(a) Each application for a dispensary license shall include both an individual
applicant and an applying entity.

(b) The application shall be submitted to the
department and shall include supporting documentation to establish the
following:

(1) That the individual applicant:

(A) Has been a legal resident of the State for
not less than five years preceding the date of application;

(B) Is not less than twenty-one years of age;
and

(C) Has had no felony convictions;

(2) That the applying entity:

(A) Has been organized under the laws of the
State;

(B) Has a Hawaii tax identification number;

(C) Has a department of commerce and consumer
affairs business registration division number and suffix;

(D) Has a federal employer identification
number;

(E) Is not less than fifty-one per cent held
by Hawaii legal residents or entities wholly controlled by Hawaii legal
residents who have been Hawaii legal residents for not less than five years
immediately preceding the date the application was submitted;

(F) Has financial resources under its control
of not less than $1,000,000 for each license applied for, plus not less than
$100,000 for each retail dispensing location allowed under the license applied
for, in the form of bank statements or escrow accounts, and that the financial
resources have been under the control of the applying entity for not less than
ninety days immediately preceding the date the application was submitted; and

(G) Is composed of principals or members, each
of whom has no felony convictions.

(c) A dispensary license shall not be sold or
otherwise transferred from one person to another person. [L 2015, c 241, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next